Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3608
Delivered or delivery, defined.

Delivered or delivery shall mean receiving corn for any use, except for storage, and includes receiving corn for consumption, for utilization, or as a result of sale in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1996, LB 1336, § 3.